Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 63.2-1500.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 264, cl. 2.

History.

Repealed by 2022, c. 264.

§ 63.2-1501.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Court”
means the juvenile and domestic relations district court of the county or city.

“Prevention”
means efforts that (i) promote health and competence in people and (ii) create, promote and strengthen environments that nurture people in their development.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.2; 1981, c. 123; 1986, c. 308; 1990, c. 760; 1995, c. 520; 2000, c. 500; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to scope of confidentiality of identity of complainant and certain other parties when the Department of Social Services conducts and inspections and
investigations, see §

63.2-1729

. For proscription against retaliation against reports of child or adult abuse or neglect, see §

63.2-1731

.

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976).

For comment on child abuse and divorce under Virginia law, see 9 G.M.U. L. Rev. 55 (1986).

For comment on student rights in Virginia public schools, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1988).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 797 (1992).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 63.2-1502.
Establishment of Child-Protective Services Unit; duties.

There is created a Child-Protective Services Unit in the Department that shall have the following powers and duties:

To evaluate and strengthen all local, regional and state programs dealing with child abuse and neglect.

To assume primary responsibility for directing the planning and funding of child-protective services. This shall include reviewing and approving the annual proposed plans and budgets for protective services submitted by the local departments.

To assist in developing programs aimed at discovering and preventing the many factors causing child abuse and neglect.

To prepare and disseminate, including the presentation of, educational programs and materials on child abuse and neglect.

To provide educational programs for professionals required by law to make reports under this chapter.

To establish standards of training and provide educational programs to qualify workers in the field of child-protective services. Such standards of training shall include provisions regarding the legal duties of the workers in order to protect the constitutional and statutory rights and safety of children and families from the initial time of contact during investigation through treatment.

To establish standards of training and educational programs to qualify workers to determine whether complaints of abuse or neglect of a child in a private or state-operated hospital, institution or other facility, or public school, are founded.

To maintain staff qualified pursuant to Board regulations to assist local department personnel in determining whether an employee of a private or state-operated hospital, institution or other facility or an employee of a school board, abused or neglected a child in such hospital, institution, or other facility, or public school.

To monitor the processing and determination of cases where an employee of a private or state-operated hospital, institution or other facility, or an employee of a school board, is suspected of abusing or neglecting a child in such hospital, institution, or other facility, or public school.

To help coordinate child-protective services at the state, regional, and local levels with the efforts of other state and voluntary social, medical and legal agencies.

To maintain a child abuse and neglect information system that includes all cases of child abuse and neglect within the Commonwealth.

To provide for methods to preserve the confidentiality of all records in order to protect the rights of the child, and his parents or guardians.

To establish minimum training requirements for workers and supervisors on family abuse and domestic violence, including the relationship between domestic violence and child abuse and neglect.

To establish minimum training requirements for workers and supervisors on identifying, assessing, and providing comprehensive services for children who are victims of sex trafficking or severe forms of trafficking as defined in the Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000, 22 U.S.C § 7102 et seq., and in the Justice for Victims of Trafficking Act of 2015, 42 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq., including efforts to coordinate with law-enforcement, juvenile justice, and social service agencies such as runaway and homeless youth shelters to serve this population.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.7; 1984, c. 734; 1993, c. 955; 2000, c. 500; 2002, c. 747; 2004, cc. 93, 233, 972, 980; 2016, c. 631.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 93 and 233 are identical, and added the last sentence in subdivision 6.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 972 and 980 are identical, and added subdivision 13.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 631 added subdivision 14.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Participation in meetings of jurisdiction’s multidisciplinary child sexual abuse response team. —

A Commonwealth’s Attorney must permit a representative of the local child protective services unit to participate in review meetings of the jurisdiction’s multidisciplinary child sexual abuse response team pursuant to §

15.2-1627.5

. See opinion of Attorney General to Stephen V. Durbin, Esquire, Floyd County Attorney, 19-001, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (3/29/19).

§ 63.2-1503.
Local departments to establish child-protective services; duties.

Each local department shall establish child-protective services under a departmental coordinator within such department or with one or more adjacent local departments that shall be staffed with qualified personnel pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board. The local department shall be the public agency responsible for receiving and responding to complaints and reports, except that (i) in cases where the reports or complaints are to be made to the court and the judge determines that no local department within a reasonable geographic distance can impartially respond to the report, the court shall assign the report to the court services unit for evaluation; and (ii) in cases where an employee at a private or state-operated hospital, institution or other facility, or an employee of a school board is suspected of abusing or neglecting a child in such hospital, institution or other facility, or public school, the local department shall request the Department and the relevant private or state-operated hospital, institution or other facility, or school board to assist in conducting a joint investigation in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board, in consultation with the Departments of Education, Health, Medical Assistance Services, Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, Juvenile Justice and Corrections.

The local department shall ensure, through its own personnel or through cooperative arrangements with other local agencies, the capability of receiving reports or complaints and responding to them promptly on a 24-hours-a-day, seven-days-per-week basis.

The local department shall widely publicize a telephone number for receiving complaints and reports.

The local department shall notify the local attorney for the Commonwealth and the local law-enforcement agency of all complaints of suspected child abuse or neglect involving (i) any death of a child; (ii) any injury or threatened injury to the child in which a felony or Class 1 misdemeanor is also suspected; (iii) any sexual abuse, suspected sexual abuse or other sexual offense involving a child, including but not limited to the use or display of the child in sexually explicit visual material, as defined in §

18.2-374.1

; (iv) any abduction of a child; (v) any felony or Class 1 misdemeanor drug offense involving a child; or (vi) contributing to the delinquency of a minor in violation of §

18.2-371

, immediately, but in no case more than two hours of receipt of the complaint, and shall provide the attorney for the Commonwealth and the local law-enforcement agency with records and information of the local department, including records related to any complaints of abuse or neglect involving the victim or the alleged perpetrator, related to the investigation of the complaint. The local department shall notify the local attorney for the Commonwealth of all complaints of suspected child abuse or neglect involving the child’s being left alone in the same dwelling with a person to whom the child is not related by blood or marriage and who has been convicted of an offense against a minor for which registration is required as a Tier III offender pursuant to §

9.1-902

, immediately, but in no case more than two hours of receipt of the complaint, and shall provide the attorney for the Commonwealth with records and information of the local department that would help determine whether a violation of post-release conditions, probation, parole, or court order has occurred due to the nonrelative offender’s contact with the child. The local department shall not allow reports of the death of the victim from other local agencies to substitute for direct reports to the attorney for the Commonwealth and the local law-enforcement agency. The local department shall develop, when practicable, memoranda of understanding for responding to reports of child abuse and neglect with local law enforcement and the attorney for the Commonwealth.In each case in which the local department notifies the local law-enforcement agency of a complaint pursuant to this subsection, the local department shall, within two business days of delivery of the notification, complete a written report, on a form provided by the Board for such purpose, which shall include (a) the name of the representative of the local department providing notice required by this subsection; (b) the name of the local law-enforcement officer who received such notice; (c) the date and time that notification was made; (d) the identity of the victim; (e) the identity of the person alleged to have abused or neglected the child, if known; (f) the clause or clauses in this subsection that describe the reasons for the notification; and (g) the signatures, which may be electronic signatures, of the representatives of the local department making the notification and the local law-enforcement officer receiving the notification. Such report shall be included in the record of the investigation and may be submitted either in writing or electronically.

When abuse or neglect is suspected in any case involving the death of a child, the local department shall report the case immediately to the regional medical examiner and the local law-enforcement agency.

The local department shall use reasonable diligence to locate (i) any child for whom a report of suspected abuse or neglect has been received and is under investigation, receiving family assessment, or for whom a founded determination of abuse and neglect has been made and a child-protective services case opened and (ii) persons who are the subject of a report that is under investigation or receiving family assessment, if the whereabouts of the child or such persons are unknown to the local department.

When an abused or neglected child and the persons who are the subject of an open child-protective services case have relocated out of the jurisdiction of the local department, the local department shall notify the child-protective services agency in the jurisdiction to which such persons have relocated, whether inside or outside of the Commonwealth, and forward to such agency relevant portions of the case record. The receiving local department shall arrange protective and rehabilitative services as required by this section.

When a child for whom a report of suspected abuse or neglect has been received and is under investigation or receiving family assessment and the child and the child’s parents or other persons responsible for the child’s care who are the subject of the report that is under investigation or family assessment have relocated out of the jurisdiction of the local department, the local department shall notify the child-protective services agency in the jurisdiction to which the child and such persons have relocated, whether inside or outside of the Commonwealth, and complete such investigation or family assessment by requesting such agency’s assistance in completing the investigation or family assessment. The local department that completes the investigation or family assessment shall forward to the receiving agency relevant portions of the case record in order for the receiving agency to arrange protective and rehabilitative services as required by this section.

Upon receipt of a report of child abuse or neglect, the local department shall determine the validity of such report and shall make a determination to conduct an investigation pursuant to §

63.2-1505

or, if designated as a child-protective services differential response agency by the Department according to §

63.2-1504

, a family assessment pursuant to §

63.2-1506

.

The local department shall foster, when practicable, the creation, maintenance and coordination of hospital and community-based multidisciplinary teams that shall include where possible, but not be limited to, members of the medical, mental health, social work, nursing, education, legal and law-enforcement professions. Such teams shall assist the local departments in identifying abused and neglected children; coordinating medical, social, and legal services for the children and their families; developing innovative programs for detection and prevention of child abuse; promoting community concern and action in the area of child abuse and neglect; and disseminating information to the general public with respect to the problem of child abuse and neglect and the facilities and prevention and treatment methods available to combat child abuse and neglect. These teams may be the family assessment and planning teams established pursuant to §

2.2-5207

. Multidisciplinary teams may develop agreements regarding the exchange of information among the parties for the purposes of the investigation and disposition of complaints of child abuse and neglect, delivery of services and child protection. Any information exchanged in accordance with the agreement shall not be considered to be a violation of the provisions of §

63.2-102

,

63.2-104

, or

63.2-105

.The local department shall also coordinate its efforts in the provision of these services for abused and neglected children with the judge and staff of the court.

The local department may develop multidisciplinary teams to provide consultation to the local department during the investigation of selected cases involving child abuse or neglect, and to make recommendations regarding the prosecution of such cases. These teams may include, but are not limited to, members of the medical, mental health, legal and law-enforcement professions, including the attorney for the Commonwealth or his designee; a local child-protective services representative; and the guardian ad litem or other court-appointed advocate for the child. Any information exchanged for the purpose of such consultation shall not be considered a violation of §

63.2-102

,

63.2-104

, or

63.2-105

.

The local department shall report annually on its activities concerning abused and neglected children to the court and to the Child-Protective Services Unit in the Department on forms provided by the Department.

Statements, or any evidence derived therefrom, made to local department child-protective services personnel, or to any person performing the duties of such personnel, by any person accused of the abuse, injury, neglect or death of a child after the arrest of such person, shall not be used in evidence in the case-in-chief against such person in the criminal proceeding on the question of guilt or innocence over the objection of the accused, unless the statement was made after such person was fully advised (i) of his right to remain silent, (ii) that anything he says may be used against him in a court of law, (iii) that he has a right to the presence of an attorney during any interviews, and (iv) that if he cannot afford an attorney, one will be appointed for him prior to any questioning.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the local department, in accordance with Board regulations, shall transmit information regarding reports, complaints, family assessments, and investigations involving children of active duty members of the United States Armed Forces or members of their household to family advocacy representatives of the United States Armed Forces.

The local department shall notify the custodial parent and make reasonable efforts to notify the noncustodial parent as those terms are defined in §

63.2-1900

of a report of suspected abuse or neglect of a child who is the subject of an investigation or is receiving family assessment, in those cases in which such custodial or noncustodial parent is not the subject of the investigation.

The local department shall (i) notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction without delay when an individual holding a license issued by the Board of Education is the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and shall transmit identifying information regarding such individual if the local department knows the person holds a license issued by the Board of Education and (ii) notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction without delay if the founded complaint of child abuse or neglect is dismissed following an appeal pursuant to §

63.2-1526

. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to affect the rights of any individual holding a license issued by the Board of Education to any hearings or appeals otherwise provided by law. Any information exchanged for the purpose of this subsection shall not be considered a violation of §

63.2-102

,

63.2-104

, or

63.2-105

.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.6; 1978, c. 747; 1979, cc. 347, 348; 1984, c. 392; 1987, c. 443; 1989, cc. 109, 547; 1991, c. 644; 1992, cc. 214, 837, 880; 1993, cc. 506, 955; 1994, cc. 643, 675, 840; 1996, cc. 858, 863; 1998, cc. 704, 716; 2000, cc. 500, 854; 2002, c. 747; 2004, cc. 114, 220, 886; 2008, cc. 474, 827; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2014, cc. 300, 565; 2017, cc. 88, 142; 2018, cc. 5, 209, 823; 2020, c. 829.

Cross references.

As to types of information required to be made available under the Virginia Child Protection Accountability System, see §

63.2-1530

.

As to the administration of state agency systems that include personal information, see §

2.2-3803

. As to disclosure of social security numbers in public records, see §

2.2-3815

.

As to punishment for felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to mandatory provision of coverage for childhood immunizations, see §

38.2-3411.3

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 114 and 220 are identical, and substituted “24” for “twenty-four” in subsection B; added the last sentence in subsection D; in the first paragraph of subsection J, substituted “multidisciplinary” for “multi-disciplinary” twice; and rewrote subsection K, which formerly read: “The local department shall develop, where practical, memoranda of understanding for responding to reports of child abuse and neglect with local law enforcement and the attorney for the Commonwealth.” Acts 2004, c. 114 also deleted a comma following “delivery of services” in subsection J. Subsection J has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2004 amendment by c. 886 substituted “24” for “twenty-four” in subsection B; in subsection J, twice substituted “multidisciplinary” for “multi-disciplinary”; and added subsection O.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 474 and 827 are nearly identical, and substituted “§

63.2-102

,

63.2-104

, or

63.2-104

” for “§§

63.2-102

, 63.2-104, or §

63.2-105

” in subsections J and K; and added subsection P.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” near the end of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 300 and 565 are identical, and in subsection D, in the first paragraph, substituted “notify the local attorney” for “upon receipt of a complaint, report immediately to the attorney” and “of all complaints of suspected child abuse or neglect” for “and make available to them the records of the local department when abuse or neglect is suspected in any case,” inserted “any” twice, inserted “immediately, but in no case more than two hours of receipt of the complaint,” “shall,” “and information,” “the local department, including records related to,” “related to the investigation of the complaint,” in the first sentence, and added the second paragraph.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 88 and 142 are identical, and in subsection N, deleted “regarding founded complaints or family assessments and may transmit other information” following “shall transmit information” and substituted “children of active duty members of the United States Armed Forces” for “active duty military personnel.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 5 and 209 are identical, and in subsection P, inserted the clause (i) designator and “without delay” and substituted clause (ii) for “after all rights to any appeal provided by §

63.2-1526

have been exhausted” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2018 amendment by c. 823 inserted the second sentence in subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829, in the first paragraph of subsection D, in the second sentence, substituted “Tier III” for “violent sexual” and deleted “sexual” preceding “offender’s” near the end of the sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 81.

§ 63.2-1504.
Child-protective services differential response system.

The Department shall implement a child-protective services differential response system in all local departments. The differential response system allows local departments to respond to valid reports or complaints of child abuse or neglect by conducting either an investigation or a family assessment. The Department shall publish a plan to implement the child-protective services differential response system in local departments by July 1, 2000, and complete implementation in all local departments by July 1, 2003. The Department shall develop a training program for all staff persons involved in the differential response system, and all such staff shall receive this training.

History.

2000, c. 500, § 63.1-248.2:1; 2002, c. 747.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Department discretion. —

Department of Social Services complied with agency procedures; although the type of neglect in this case was not one where an investigation was mandated, Department of Social Services properly exercised its discretion and determined that this was a type of neglect that would be subject to an investigation. Rhodes v. Va. Dep't of Soc. Servs., 95 Va. Cir. 302, 2017 Va. Cir. LEXIS 46 (Roanoke Mar. 16, 2017).

§ 63.2-1505.
Investigations by local departments.

An investigation requires the collection of information necessary to determine:

The immediate safety needs of the child;

The protective and rehabilitative services needs of the child and family that will deter abuse or neglect;

Risk of future harm to the child;

Alternative plans for the child’s safety if protective and rehabilitative services are indicated and the family is unable or unwilling to participate in services;

Whether abuse or neglect has occurred;

If abuse or neglect has occurred, who abused or neglected the child; and

A finding of either founded or unfounded based on the facts collected during the investigation.

If the local department responds to the report or complaint by conducting an investigation, the local department shall:

Make immediate investigation and, if the report or complaint was based upon one of the factors specified in subsection B of §

63.2-1509

, the local department may file a petition pursuant to § 16.1-241.3;

Complete a report and enter it into the statewide automation system maintained by the Department;

Consult with the family to arrange for necessary protective and rehabilitative services to be provided to the child and his family;

Petition the court for services deemed necessary including, but not limited to, removal of the child or his siblings from their home;

Determine within 45 days if a report of abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded and transmit a report to such effect to the Department and to the person who is the subject of the investigation. However, upon written justification by the local department, the time for such determination may be extended not to exceed a total of 60 days or, in the event that the investigation is being conducted in cooperation with a law-enforcement agency and both parties agree that circumstances so warrant, as stated in the written justification, the time for such determination may be extended not to exceed 90 days. If through the exercise of reasonable diligence the local department is unable to find the child who is the subject of the report, the time the child cannot be found shall not be computed as part of the total time period allowed for the investigation and determination and documentation of such reasonable diligence shall be placed in the record. In cases involving the death of a child or alleged sexual abuse of a child who is the subject of the report, the time during which records necessary for the investigation of the complaint but not created by the local department, including autopsy or medical or forensic records or reports, are not available to the local department due to circumstances beyond the local department’s control shall not be computed as part of the total time period allowed for the investigation and determination, and documentation of the circumstances that resulted in the delay shall be placed in the record. In cases in which the subject of the investigation is a full-time, part-time, permanent, or temporary employee of a school division who is suspected of abusing or neglecting a child in the course of his educational employment, the time period for determining whether a report is founded or unfounded and transmitting a report to that effect to the Department and the person who is the subject of the investigation shall be mandatory, and every local department shall make the required determination and report within the specified time period without delay;

If a report of abuse or neglect is unfounded, transmit a report to such effect to the complainant and parent or guardian and the person responsible for the care of the child in those cases where such person was suspected of abuse or neglect;

If a report of child abuse and neglect is founded, and the subject of the report is or was at the time of the investigation or the conduct that led to the report a full-time, part-time, permanent, or temporary employee of a school division located within the Commonwealth, notify the relevant school board of the founded complaint without delay; and

Upon request, disclose to the child’s parent or guardian the location of the child, provided that (i) the investigation has not been completed and a report has not been transmitted pursuant to subdivision 5; (ii) the parent or guardian requesting disclosure of the child’s location has not been the subject of a founded report of child abuse or neglect; (iii) the parent or guardian requesting disclosure of the child’s location has legal custody of the child and provides to the local department any records or other information necessary to verify such custody; (iv) the local department is not aware of any court order, and has confirmed with the child’s other parent or guardian or other person responsible for the care of the child that no court order has been issued, that prohibits or limits contact by the parent or guardian requesting disclosure of the child’s location with the child, the child’s other parent or guardian or other person responsible for the care of the child, or any member of the household in which the child is located; and (v) disclosure of the child’s location to the parent or guardian will not compromise the safety of the child, the child’s other parent or guardian, or any other person responsible for the care of the child.Any information exchanged for the purposes of this subsection shall not be considered a violation of §

63.2-102

,

63.2-104

, or

63.2-105

.

Each local board may obtain and consider, in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board, statewide criminal history record information from the Central Criminal Records Exchange and shall obtain and consider results of a search of the child abuse and neglect central registry of any individual who is the subject of a child abuse or neglect investigation conducted under this section when there is evidence of child abuse or neglect and the local board is evaluating the safety of the home and whether removal will protect a child from harm. The local board shall determine whether the individual has resided in another state within at least the preceding five years and, if he has resided in another state, the local board shall request a search of the child abuse and neglect registry or equivalent registry maintained by such state. The local board also may obtain such a criminal records or registry search on all adult household members residing in the home where the individual who is the subject of the investigation resides and the child resides or visits. If a child abuse or neglect petition is filed in connection with such removal, a court may admit such information as evidence. Where the individual who is the subject of such information contests its accuracy through testimony under oath in hearing before the court, no court shall receive or consider the contested criminal history record information without certified copies of conviction. Further dissemination of the information provided to the local board is prohibited, except as authorized by law.

A person who has not previously participated in the investigation of complaints of child abuse or neglect in accordance with this chapter shall not participate in the investigation of any case involving a complaint of alleged sexual abuse of a child unless he (i) has completed a Board-approved training program for the investigation of complaints involving alleged sexual abuse of a child or (ii) is under the direct supervision of a person who has completed a Board-approved training program for the investigation of complaints involving alleged sexual abuse of a child. No individual may make a determination of whether a case involving a complaint of alleged sexual abuse of a child is founded or unfounded unless he has completed a Board-approved training program for the investigation of complaints involving alleged sexual abuse of a child.

Any individual who is the subject of a child abuse or neglect investigation conducted under this section shall notify the local department prior to changing his place of residence and provide the local department with the address of his new residence.

History.

2000, c. 500, § 63.1-248.6:01; 2002, c. 747; 2007, c. 495; 2008, c. 555; 2013, cc. 340, 506; 2014, cc. 299, 504; 2015, c. 524; 2017, cc. 176, 428; 2018, cc. 3, 193; 2019, cc. 276, 436; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 305.

Cross references.

As to types of information required to be made available under the Virginia Child Protection Accountability System, see §

63.2-1530

. As to dissemination of criminal history record information, see §

19.2-389

. As to grounds for dismissal of teachers, see § 22.1-307.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 176 and 428, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2019, c. 436, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Department of Social Services (the Department) shall document and report to the General Assembly and the Governor by November 1, 2020, the number of individuals who notified a local department of social services of an address change and provided updated contact information pursuant to §

63.2-1505

or

63.2-1506

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, between July 1, 2019, and July 1, 2020. Local departments of social services shall provide all information necessary to generate such report to the Department.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 495 added subsection C and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 555 added subdivision B 7 and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 340 added the last sentence in subdivision B 5.

The 2013 amendment by c. 506 substituted “employee of” for “teacher in” in the first sentence in subdivision B 7.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 299, added subsection D.

The 2014 amendment by c. 504, in subdivision B 5, inserted “the time for” and “or, in the event that the investigation is being conducted in cooperation with a law-enforcement agency and both parties agree that circumstances so warrant, as stated in the written justification, the time for such determination may be extended not to exceed 90 days” in the second sentence, and substituted “total time period allowed for the investigation and determination” for “45-day or 60-day period” twice in the last sentence, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 524 added the fifth sentence of subdivision B 5.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 176 and 428 are identical, and rewrote subdivision B 2, which formerly read: “Complete a report and transmit it forthwith to the Department, except that no such report shall be transmitted in cases in which the cause to suspect abuse or neglect is one of the factors specified in subsection B of §

63.2-1509

and the mother sought substance abuse counseling or treatment prior to the child’s birth.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 3 and 193 are identical, and inserted “or was at the time of the investigation or the conduct that led to the report” and “without delay” in subdivision B 7.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 276, in subsection C, inserted “shall obtain and consider” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment by c. 436 added subsection E.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 305, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision B 8 and made related changes.